District of Columbia statutes.
7-1231.03

Forensic consumers.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to abridge the rights of persons committed to the care of the Department by order of the court in a criminal proceeding.

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 203, 48 DCR 7674
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 203 of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).